Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-735
School books, equipment, and supplies; payment.

For the purpose of paying for school books, equipment, and supplies, the school district officers may draw an order on the district treasurer for the amount of school books, equipment, and supplies ordered.

Laws 1891, c. 46, § 3, p. 335;

R.S.1913, § 6916;

C.S.1922, § 6500;

C.S.1929, § 79-1803;

R.S.1943, § 79-1803;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 157, p. 745;

Laws 1971, LB 659, § 3;

Laws 1972, LB 1219, § 2;

Laws 1973, LB 358, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 757, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,119;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 409.

L.B. 659, Laws 1971, intended to provide financial assistance to nonpublic schools through the loan of secular textbooks, is unconstitutional. Gaffney v. State Department of Education, 192 Neb. 358, 220 N.W.2d 550 (1974).